Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.093

Program for military personnel—Limitation.

Prior to the state board granting authorization for any programs authorized under RCW 28B.50.092, the state board shall determine that such authorization will not deter from the primary functions of the community and technical college system within the state of Washington as prescribed by chapter 28B.50 RCW.

[ 1991 c 238 s 35; 1973 c 105 s 2.]